Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 9.4. Campaign Fundraising; Legislative Sessions.

§ 24.2-954.
Campaign fundraising; legislative sessions; penalties.

No member of the General Assembly or statewide official and no campaign committee of a member of the General Assembly or statewide official shall solicit or accept a contribution for the campaign committee of any member of the General Assembly or statewide official, or for any political committee, from any person or political committee on and after the first day of a regular session of the General Assembly through adjournment sine die of that session.

No person or political committee shall make or promise to make a contribution to a member of the General Assembly or statewide official or his campaign committee on and after the first day of a regular session of the General Assembly through adjournment sine die of that session.

The restrictions of this section shall not apply to a contribution (i) made by a member of the General Assembly or statewide official from his personal funds or (ii) made to the campaign committee of a candidate in a special election.

As used in this section:“Adjournment sine die” means adjournment on the last legislative day of the regular session, and such session does not include the ensuing reconvened session;“Campaign committee,” “contribution,” “person,” and “political committee” shall be defined as provided in §

24.2-945.1

except that “contribution” shall not include money, services, or things of value in any way provided by a candidate to his own campaign and the payment by the candidate of any primary filing fee;“Solicit” means request a contribution, orally or in writing, but shall not include a request for support of a candidate or his position on an issue; and“Statewide official” means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, and Attorney General.

Any person who violates, or aids, abets, or participates in the violation of, this section shall be subject to a civil penalty equal to the amount of the prohibited contribution or promised contribution or $500, whichever amount is greater. The attorney for the Commonwealth shall initiate civil proceedings to enforce the civil penalty provided herein. Any civil penalties collected shall be payable to the State Treasurer for deposit to the general fund.

History.

1997, c. 876, §

24.2-940

; 2006, cc. 787, 892.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Civil Practice and Procedure,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (2007).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Election Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 181 (2012).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Campaign contribution received prior to regular session. —

A member of the House of Delegates could deposit a campaign contribution where the check was received prior to the commencement of the regular session of the General Assembly, but the member was unable to access his bank account to deposit the check prior to the commencement of the regular session. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 01-012 (2/8/01) (decided under prior law).

Campaign fundraising. —

Section

24.2-954

precludes members of the General Assembly from engaging in fundraising activity in connection with a campaign for state office during a regular session of the General Assembly. However, that prohibition does not restrict fundraising activity related to a campaign for federal office. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert Hurt, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-005, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 4 (1/25/10).

Federal law preempts Virginia’s fundraising prohibition when a General Assembly member solicits or accepts contributions solely for a federal office. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert Hurt, Member, Senate of Virginia, 10-005, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 4 (1/25/10).

Member of the General Assembly is not precluded from raising funds for a candidate for federal office while the General Assembly is in session. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jeffrey L. McWaters, Member, Senate of Virginia, 12-001, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 4 (1/25/12).

A member of the General Assembly is not precluded from soliciting or accepting contributions during a regular session of the General Assembly on behalf of the following: (1) candidates for public office in states other than Virginia; (2) federal political action committees; (3) federal accounts maintained by state, congressional district, or county or city political party committees pursuant to federal campaign finance laws; and (4) independent expenditure only committees (commonly referred to as “Super PACs”) if they are considered “federal political action committees” under §

24.2-945.1

. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable Scott A. Surovell, Member, House of Delegates, 12-014, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 53 (7/12/13).

“Conduct of elections.” —

Regulations implementing Chapters 9.3, 9.4, and 9.5 of Title 24.2 do not relate to “the conduct of elections and eligibility to vote,” and therefore do not qualify for an exemption from the regulatory process established by the Virginia Administrative Process Act. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Edgardo Cortes, Commissioner of Elections, No. 14-038, 2014 Va. AG LEXIS 56 (10/1/14).